Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1846
Victim and witness assistance centers; purposes.

The centers shall be designed to:

(1) Assist criminal justice agencies in giving more consideration and personal attention to victims and witnesses through the delivery of services to victims and witnesses of crimes;

(2) Provide a model for other community-based efforts to aid victims and witnesses;

(3) Sensitize law enforcement officials, communications technicians, and supervisors to the needs of victims of crime and encourage a concerned approach to such victims;

(4) Attempt to decrease the incidence of unreported crimes; and

(5) Assure that victims and witnesses are informed of the progress of the case in which they are involved.

Laws 1981, LB 477, § 4.